Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-121
Writs of attachment; fees; expenses; taxed as costs.

In all cases where writs of attachment against property are issued, the officers to whom such writ is directed for service shall be empowered to demand in advance, and receive before said service, the regular fees for service of papers, and in addition thereto a sum of money sufficient to defray the expenses incurred for work and labor in the taking possession of or removal of the property ordered attached, and for the safekeeping thereof; said sum to be taxed in the costs.

Laws 1871, § 1, p. 116;

R.S.1913, § 2446;

C.S.1922, § 2386;

C.S.1929, § 33-125;

R.S.1943, § 33-121.

A sheriff may return as costs in an attachment suit all actual, necessary, and reasonable charges and expenses which he incurs in taking possession, removing, and preserving the attached property, such as the cost of hiring men to husk standing corn and to look after and feed livestock. William Deering & Company v. Wisherd, 46 Neb. 720, 65 N.W. 788 (1896).